Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.060

Director—Appointment—Salary—Vacancy—Delegation of powers and duties.

The executive head of the office of financial management shall be the director, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. He or she shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in his or her position while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate, when he or she shall present to that body his or her nomination for the office. The director may delegate such of his or her powers, duties and functions to other officers and employees of the department as he or she may deem necessary to the fulfillment of the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5118; 1979 c 151 s 112; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 4.]